Arkansas, session 2025, SB449.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code Title 16, Chapter 120, Subchapter 8, is
amended to add an additional section to read as follows:
16-120-805. Civil immunity for confiscation of certain products from
minor at school.
(a) As used in this section:
(1)(A) “Alternative nicotine product” means a product that
consists of or contains nicotine from any source that can be ingested into
the body by chewing, smoking, absorbing, dissolving, inhaling, snorting,
sniffing, or by any other means.
(B) “Alternative nicotine product” does not include a:
(i) Tobacco product;
*JMB430*
03/12/2025 5:34:37 PM JMB430

SB449
(ii) Vapor product;
(iii) Product that is a drug under 21 U.S.C. §
321(g)(1), as existing on January 1, 2025;
(iv) Product that is a device under 21 U.S.C. §
321(h), as existing on January 1, 2025; or
(v) Product that constitutes a combination drug,
device, or biological product as described in 21 U.S.C. § 353, as existing on
January 1, 2025;
(2) “E-liquid product” means a liquid product, which may or may
not contain nicotine, that is inhaled when using a vapor product and that may
or may not include without limitation propylene glycol, vegetable glycerin,
nicotine from any source, and flavorings;
(3) "Minor" means a person who is under twenty-one (21) years of
age;
(4) “School” means:
(A) A school district, public school, private school, or
an open-enrollment public charter school;
(B) Any building, parking lot, playing field, playground,
school bus, or other school vehicle used or operated by a public school,
private school, or an open-enrollment public charter school; or
(C) Any off-campus school-sponsored or school-sanctioned
events with respect to any public school, open-enrollment public charter
school, or private school where children attend classes in kindergarten
through grade twelve (K-12);
(5) “Tobacco product” means all products containing tobacco for
consumption, including without limitation cigarettes, cigars, little cigars,
cigarillos, chewing tobacco, smokeless tobacco, snuff, smoking tobacco,
including pipe tobacco, and smoking tobacco substitutes; and
(6) “Vapor product” means an electronic oral device of any size
or shape that contains a vapor of nicotine, e-liquid, or any other substance
that when used or inhaled simulates smoking, regardless of whether a visible
vapor is produced, including without limitation a device that:
(A) Is composed of a heating element, battery, electronic
circuit, chemical process, mechanical device, or a combination of heating
element, battery, electronic circuit, chemical process, or mechanical device;
(B) Works in combination with a cartridge, other
03/12/2025 5:34:37 PM JMB430

SB449
container, or liquid delivery device containing nicotine, e-liquid, or any
other substance and manufactured for use with vapor products;
(C) Is manufactured, distributed, marketed, or sold as any
type or derivation of a vapor product, e-cigarette, e-cigar, e-pipe, or any
other product name or descriptor; and
(D) Does not include a product regulated as a drug or
device by the Federal Food, Drug, and Cosmetic Act, 21 U.S.C. § 301 et seq.,
as it existed on January 1, 2025.
(b) A law enforcement officer, an employee of a school, or a person
otherwise in a position of trust or authority over the minor shall be immune
from civil liability if he or she confiscated nicotine, tobacco product,
vapor product, alternative nicotine product, e-liquid product, or cigarette
papers or confiscated a product that he or she reasonably believes to be a
vapor product, from a minor at a school.
(c) The immunity granted under subsection (b) of this section does not
apply to the confiscation of any sort of medical device or medication such as
an asthma medication delivery device.



















03/12/2025 5:34:37 PM JMB430